Illinois, session 104th, SB3765.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Short 5Line Railroad Modernization Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Credit" means the Short Line Railroad Infrastructure 8Modernization Credit awarded under this Act.9    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 10Opportunity.11    "Qualified applicant" means:12        (1) a railroad company located in whole or in part in 13    Illinois that is classified by the United States Surface 14    Transportation Board as a Class II or Class III railroad 15    and that makes qualified railroad expenditures; or16        (2) an owner or lessee of a rail siding, industrial 17    spur, or industry track that is located (A) on or adjacent 18    to a Class II or Class III railroad in Illinois or (B) in a 19    qualified project location if the applicant makes 20    qualified new rail infrastructure expenditures.21    "Qualified new rail infrastructure" means:22        (1) new track infrastructure such as industrial leads, 23    switches, spurs, sidings, rail loading docks, and   SB3765- 2 -LRB104 20697 HLH 34197 b1    transloading structures;2        (2) infrastructure necessary for engineering and site 3    preparation involved with servicing rail-served customer 4    locations;5        (3) infrastructure associated with the expansion of a 6    Class II or Class III railroad; and 7        (4) new track infrastructure constructed to serve 8    rail-served customer locations located in a qualified 9    project location.10    "Qualified project location" means an Enterprise Zone or a 11county in Illinois with a population of not more than 500,000 12inhabitants.13    "Qualified railroad expenditures" means gross expenditures 14for maintenance, reconstruction, or replacement of existing 15railroad infrastructure that is owned or leased by a Class II 16or Class III railroad and is located partly or wholly in 17Illinois, including track, roadbed, bridges, crossings, 18signals, industrial leads and sidings, and track related 19structures. "Qualified railroad expenditures" does not include 20expenditures that are used to generate a federal tax credit or 21that are funded by a State or federal grant.22    "Rail-served customer location" means a location in the 23State at which qualified new rail infrastructure will be 24constructed to connect a customer's facility to a rail line 25either by building a new facility with rail access or by 26connecting an existing facility to the rail network.  SB3765- 3 -LRB104 20697 HLH 34197 b1    "Taxpayer" means a qualified applicant that is (i) subject 2to subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of the Illinois 3Income Tax Act or (ii) a tax-exempt entity that is owned by a 4port or a governmental entity. 5    Section 10. Purpose. The Illinois General Assembly finds 6that a modern, efficient, and safe rail system is vital to 7Illinois' economic competitiveness, supply chain resilience, 8and environmental goals. Through targeted investment in short 9line railroads, industrial sidings, and new freight rail 10infrastructure, this Act is intended to spur private sector 11development, strengthen rural and urban connectivity, and 12ensure that Illinois remains a national leader in 13transportation and logistics. This Act will support 14manufacturing, agriculture, renewable energy, and emerging 15industries by lowering shipping costs, improving access to 16global markets, and expanding multimodal opportunities. By 17adopting forward-looking infrastructure tools, Illinois will 18create good-paying jobs, attract long-term investment, reduce 19highway congestion, and decrease greenhouse gas emissions. 20Illinois must aggressively modernize its rail system so that 21businesses and communities can compete and thrive against 22domestic and foreign competitors. 23    Section 15. Allowable credits; limitations.24    (a) For taxable years that begin after January 1, 2026 and   SB3765- 4 -LRB104 20697 HLH 34197 b1begin before January 1, 2036, a taxpayer is entitled to a 2credit against the taxes imposed under subsections (a) and (b) 3of Section 201 of the Illinois Income Tax Act equal to:4        (1) the taxpayer's:5            (A) qualified railroad expenditures; and6            (B) qualified new rail infrastructure 7        expenditures; multiplied by8        (2) 50%.9    (b) The amount of a tax credit allowed under subsection 10(a) shall not exceed the following:11        (1) For qualified railroad expenditures, the product 12    of:13            (A) the number of miles of Class II or Class III 14        railroad track owned or leased by the taxpayer in 15        Illinois at the close of the taxable year; multiplied 16        by17            (B) $5,000.18        (2) For qualified new rail infrastructure 19    expenditures, the lesser of:20            (A) 50% of the qualified new rail expenditures for 21        each rail-served customer location completed by the 22        taxpayer in the taxable year; or23            (B) $2,000,000 per rail-served customer location.24    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an expenditure 25shall be classified as either a qualified railroad expenditure 26or a qualified new rail infrastructure expenditure, but not   SB3765- 5 -LRB104 20697 HLH 34197 b1both.2    (c) The aggregate amount of tax credits permitted in a 3taxable year under this Section for all taxpayers shall not 4exceed:5        (1) for qualified railroad expenditures allowed under 6    this Act, $9,000,000; and7        (2) for qualified new rail infrastructure expenditures 8    allowed under this Act, $10,000,000.9    (d) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce 10the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 11the credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess 12may be carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the 135 taxable years following the excess credit year. The credit 14shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is tax 15liability. If there are credits from more than one tax year 16that are available to offset tax liability, the earlier credit 17shall be applied first. 18    Section 20. Application; qualified railroad expenditures.19    (a) A taxpayer wishing to claim a tax credit under this 20Section must apply to the Department after completion of the 21project for which qualified railroad expenditures were 22incurred. The Department shall prescribe the form and manner 23of the application, which must include:24        (1) the number of miles of railroad track owned or 25    leased by the taxpayer in Illinois; and  SB3765- 6 -LRB104 20697 HLH 34197 b1        (2) a description and certification of the amount of 2    the taxpayer's qualified railroad expenditures.3    (b) The Department shall evaluate a taxpayer's eligibility 4for a tax credit under this Act.5    (c) The Department shall certify the eligibility of a 6taxpayer that meets the requirements for a tax credit under 7this Act.8    (d) Upon satisfactory review of the application, the 9Department shall issue a tax credit certificate to the 10taxpayer stating the amount of the tax credit earned in the 11taxable year to which the taxpayer is entitled. 12    Section 25. Application; qualified new rail infrastructure 13expenditures.14    (a) A taxpayer wishing to claim a tax credit under this 15Section must apply to the Department for precertification 16prior to commencing construction, in the form and manner 17prescribed by the Department. Upon review, and if the 18Department determines that the application conforms to the 19requirements of this Act and the rules adopted under this Act, 20the Department shall issue a precertification letter 21authorizing the taxpayer to proceed with the project.22    (b) The Department shall establish quarterly application 23windows for precertification requests. Applications received 24during a quarterly application window shall be reviewed 25together, and credits shall be awarded to taxpayer meeting   SB3765- 7 -LRB104 20697 HLH 34197 b1statutory qualifications, subject to the caps specified in 2Section 15.3    (c) If eligible applications in a quarterly period would 4cause total awards for the fiscal year to exceed the cap in 5subsection (c) of Section 15, the Department shall apply the 6prioritization criteria in subsection (d) of this Section. 7Credits shall be awarded until the annual cap is fully used.8    (d) The Department shall give priority to projects that:9        (1) provide critical rail access to industrial parks, 10    ports, or economic development projects locating adjacent 11    to rail; serve businesses in value-added agriculture, 12    advanced manufacturing, supply chain/distribution 13    solutions, or environmentally friendly or sustainable 14    manufacturers, including those reducing carbon emissions 15    or utilizing renewable energy;16        (2) located in qualified economic development area or 17    Enterprise Zone designated by the State;18        (3) demonstrate the facilitation of significant 19    private capital investment, job creation, or strategic 20    economic benefits to the State;21    (e) If aggregate funding authority under subsection (c) of 22Section 15 is not fully used in any quarterly period, the 23unused authority shall automatically carry forward to the next 24application period within the same fiscal year. Any funding 25authority not awarded by the close of the fiscal year shall 26expire.  SB3765- 8 -LRB104 20697 HLH 34197 b1    (f) A precertification is valid for 12 months after 2project award. A project that has been pre-certified must 3commence construction within 12 months of the date of the 4precertification award.5    (g) Upon project completion, the taxpayer must notify the 6Department and provide necessary documentation as required by 7the Department to calculate the tax credit and certify project 8completion. The Department shall certify the eligibility of a 9taxpayer that meets the requirements for a tax credit under 10this Act.11    (h) Upon satisfactory review of the final application and 12supporting documentation, the Department shall issue a tax 13credit certificate to the taxpayer stating the amount of tax 14credit earned in the taxable year in which the taxpayer is 15entitled. 16    Section 30. Transferability. A taxpayer may transfer the 17tax credit awarded under this Act by written agreement. A 18transfer of credits earned under this Act shall be made, in 19accordance with rules adopted by the Department, by the 20taxpayer earning the credits at any time after certification 21and before expiration of the credit. The Department shall 22issue a certificate of transfer to each transferor and 23transferee, identifying the amount of the credit transferred. 24The transfer certificate shall be attached to the transferor's 25and transferee's income tax return under the Illinois Income   SB3765- 9 -LRB104 20697 HLH 34197 b1Tax Act. 2    Section 35. Pass-through entities. For partners and 3shareholders of Subchapter S corporations, the provisions of 4Section 251 of the Illinois Income Tax Act shall apply with 5respect to the credit under this Act. 6    Section 40. Rulemaking. The Department shall adopt rules 7for the implementation of this Act. 8    Section 45. Sunset. The Department shall not enter into 9any new agreements under the provisions of this Act after 10December 31, 2036. 11    Section 900. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 12adding Section 246 as follows: 13    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)14    Sec. 246. Short Line Railroad Modernization Act. For 15taxable years that begin after January 1, 2026 and begin 16before January 1, 2036, a taxpayer that qualifies for a credit 17against the taxes imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of 18Section 201 under the Short Line Railroad Modernization Act is 19entitled to a credit as provided in that Act. 20    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.